Georgia, session 2025_26, SB126.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 20-2-2096.1 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to definitions
relative to the "Completion Special Schools Act," is amended by revising paragraphs (5)
and (6) as follows:
"(5) 'Dropout' means an individual 16 years of age or older who previously dropped out
of school according to the uniform definition of 'dropout' provided for in subsection (f)
of Code Section 20-14-33.
(6) 'Enrollment eligible student' means:
(A) An individual 18 16 years of age or older who is eligible for enrollment in
appropriate education programs as provided in subsection (a) of Code
S. B. 126
- 1 -

LC 49 2168
Section 20-2-150, who meets the definition of dropout provided in paragraph (5) of this
Code section, and who is not currently enrolled in a public school in this state; or
(B) An individual who is attending a United States Department of Defense Youth
Challenge Academy or who is in the custody of a correctional facility, detention
facility, jail, prison, or other lawful place of confinement for the period of such
attendance or custody."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 126
- 2 -